Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 279.10, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. An attendance center or school authorized to maintain a year-round calendar must serve all students attending the school and shall not be limited based on student achievement or based on the trait or characteristic of the student as defined in section 280.28 , Code 2024 . Sec. 2. Section 280.28, subsection 2, paragraph b, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: âHarassmentâ and âbullyingâ shall be construed to mean any repeated and targeted electronic, written, verbal, or physical act or conduct toward a student which is based on any actual or perceived trait or characteristic of the student and which that creates an objectively hostile school environment that meets one or more of the following conditions: House File 865, p. 2 Sec. 3. Section 280.28, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 865, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor